Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0197.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. Tuition grants are established by the this state to foster the pursuit of higher education by resident students enrolled in eligible independent nonprofit colleges or universities. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) "Eligible independent nonprofit college or university" means an independent nonprofit college or university that meets all of the following: (i) Is located in the this state. , which have (ii) Has filed with the board of education a certificate of assurance of compliance with title 6 of the civil rights act of 1964, Public Law 88-352, 77 Stat. 241, as in effect on January 1, 1966. , whose (iii) Has instructional programs that are not comprised composed solely of sectarian instruction or religious worship. , and which are (iv) Is approved by the state board of education.department. Sec. 2. The Michigan higher education assistance authority created by Act No. 77 of the Public Acts of 1960, as amended, being sections 390.951 to 390.961 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, department shall administer the grants awarded under this act, which shall must be available to each eligible resident student registered as an eligible undergraduate or graduate student. Priority shall be given The department shall give priority to full-time students. Sec. 3. (1) Upon Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), upon application of an eligible resident student who has resided in this state continuously for the preceding 12 months, is not considered a resident of any other state, is not incarcerated in a corrections institution, and is registered in an eligible independent nonprofit college or university, in this state, as described in section 1, the Michigan higher education assistance authority department shall grant an amount as provided for in this act for each semester of attendance. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a student is not eligible for a grant for tuition and fees for more than 10 semesters of undergraduate education, or its equivalent in trimesters, or its equivalent as determined by the authority department for less than full-time students. ; for more than 6 semesters of graduate education, or its equivalent in trimesters; or for more than 8 semesters in dental education, or its equivalent in trimesters. A student enrolled as an undergraduate during the 2020 spring term and the 2020-2021 academic year is eligible for a grant of tuition and fees for up to 12 semesters of undergraduate education, or its equivalent in trimesters, or its equivalent as determined by the authority department for less than full-time students. (2) A student must maintain satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the eligible independent nonprofit college or university in which the student is enrolled, to remain eligible for the tuition grant under this act. (3) If a student possessing a degree at a given academic level enrolls for a second degree at the same academic level, the authority department shall include tuition grants received by the student when enrolled for the previous degree at the same level in determining the student's eligibility under subsection (1). (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, students who receive Michigan achievement scholarships under section 248 of the school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1848, are not eligible to receive tuition grants under this act. Sec. 4. (1) The amount of the grant to be paid for each semester or trimester shall must be determined by the Michigan higher education assistance authority department based upon on an evaluation of the family's financial resources. In determining financial resources, the authority department shall use the same criteria as used in Act No. 208 of the Public Acts of 1964, as amended, being sections 390.971 to 390.981 of the Michigan Compiled Laws. 1964 PA 208, MCL 390.971 to 390.981. The evaluation shall must make allowance for other members of the applicant's family enrolled in an approved institution of higher education.eligible independent nonprofit college or university. (2) A grant shall must not be made under this act to a student who is enrolled in a program of study leading to a degree in theology, divinity, or religious education. (3) Prorated payments shall must be made at the beginning of each semester or term to the student or to the eligible independent nonprofit college or university for credit to the student's account. Sec. 5. Each tuition grant shall must not exceed the amount of tuition and fees for the full academic year as reported by the eligible independent nonprofit college or university in which the applicant is enrolled, or an amount the Michigan higher education assistance authority department finds appropriate in relation to the family's financial resources, whichever is the lesser. If there are not sufficient appropriated funds to provide each student with the grant amount for which the student is eligible, the Michigan higher education assistance authority department shall establish a maximum grant level for that academic year. Sec. 6. The Michigan higher education assistance authority department shall promulgate rules to carry out this act pursuant to Act No. 306 of the Public Acts of 1969, as amended, being sections 24.201 to 24.315 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 7. A student who receives a state competitive scholarship authorized by Act No. 208 of the Public Acts of 1964, as amended, 1964 PA 208, MCL 390.971 to 390.981, is not eligible to receive a tuition grant concurrently. However, the state competitive scholarship award of a student enrolled in an eligible independent nonprofit college or university may be increased with funds from the tuition grant program under this act up to the level of the maximum tuition grant award as provided in section 5, if the maximum tuition grant award is greater than the maximum competitive scholarship award in a given year. Sec. 7a. If a student receives other scholarship awards by a private, nonprofit institution of higher learning covering full tuition and fees, he the student is not eligible for a tuition grant. If a student receives other scholarship awards by a private, nonprofit institution of higher learning covering only a portion of his the student's tuition and fees, the student may qualify for a proportionate tuition grant in accordance with the provisions of this act.